Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2501
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-2501 to 77-2508 shall be known and may be cited as the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2016, LB884, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 338.